Nebraska, session 109, LB161.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
Section 1. Section 79-1003, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1003 For purposes of the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities
Support Act:
(1) Adjusted general fund operating expenditures means the
difference of the general fund operating expenditures increased by the
cost growth factor calculated pursuant to section 79-1007.10, minus the
transportation allowance, special receipts allowance, poverty allowance,
limited English proficiency allowance, distance education and
telecommunications allowance, elementary site allowance, summer school
allowance, community achievement plan allowance, and focus school and
program allowance;
(2) Adjusted valuation means the assessed valuation of taxable
property of each local system in the state, adjusted pursuant to the
adjustment factors described in section 79-1016. Adjusted valuation means
the adjusted valuation for the property tax year ending during the school
fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which the aid
based upon that value is to be paid. For purposes of determining the
local effort rate yield pursuant to section 79-1015.01, adjusted
valuation does not include the value of any property which a court, by a
final judgment from which no appeal is taken, has declared to be
nontaxable or exempt from taxation;
(3) Allocated income tax funds means the amount of assistance paid
to a local system pursuant to section 79-1005.01;
(4) Average daily membership means the average daily membership for
grades kindergarten through twelve attributable to the local system, as
provided in each district's annual statistical summary, and includes the
proportionate share of students enrolled in a public school instructional
program on less than a full-time basis;
(5) Base fiscal year means the first school fiscal year following
the school fiscal year in which the reorganization or unification
-2-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
occurred;
(6) Board means the school board of each school district;
(7) Categorical funds means funds limited to a specific purpose by
federal or state law, including, but not limited to, Title I funds, Title
VI funds, federal career and technical education funds, federal school
lunch funds, Indian education funds, Head Start funds, and funds received
prior to July 1, 2022, from the Nebraska Education Improvement Fund;
(8) Consolidate means to voluntarily reduce the number of school
districts providing education to a grade group and does not include
dissolution pursuant to section 79-498;
(9) Converted contract means an expired contract that was in effect
for at least fifteen school years beginning prior to school year 2012-13
for the education of students in a nonresident district in exchange for
tuition from the resident district when the expiration of such contract
results in the nonresident district educating students, who would have
been covered by the contract if the contract were still in effect, as
option students pursuant to the enrollment option program established in
section 79-234;
(10) Converted contract option student means a student who will be
an option student pursuant to the enrollment option program established
in section 79-234 for the school fiscal year for which aid is being
calculated and who would have been covered by a converted contract if the
contract were still in effect and such school fiscal year is the first
school fiscal year for which such contract is not in effect;
(11) Department means the State Department of Education;
(12) District means any school district or unified system as defined
in section 79-4,108;
(13) Ensuing school fiscal year means the school fiscal year
following the current school fiscal year;
(14) Equalization aid means the amount of assistance calculated to
be paid to a local system pursuant to section 79-1008.01;
-3-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
(15) Fall membership means the total membership in kindergarten
through grade twelve attributable to the local system as reported on the
fall school district membership reports for each district pursuant to
section 79-528;
(16) Fiscal year means the state fiscal year which is the period
from July 1 to the following June 30;
(17) Formula students means:
(a) For state aid certified pursuant to section 79-1022, the sum of
the product of fall membership from the school fiscal year immediately
preceding the school fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid
multiplied by the average ratio of average daily membership to fall
membership for the second school fiscal year immediately preceding the
school fiscal year in which the aid is to be paid and the prior two
school fiscal years plus one hundred sixty percent of the qualified early
childhood education fall membership plus tuitioned students from the
school fiscal year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which
aid is to be paid minus the product of the number of students enrolled in
kindergarten that is not full-day kindergarten from the fall membership
multiplied by 0.5; and
(b) For the final calculation of state aid pursuant to section
79-1065, the sum of average daily membership plus one hundred sixty
percent of the qualified early childhood education average daily
membership plus tuitioned students minus the product of the number of
students enrolled in kindergarten that is not full-day kindergarten from
the average daily membership multiplied by 0.5 from the school fiscal
year immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid was paid;
(18) Free lunch and free milk calculated students means, using the
most recent data available on November 1 of the school fiscal year
immediately preceding the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid,
(a) for schools that did not provide free meals to all students pursuant
to the community eligibility provision, students who individually
-4-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
qualified for free lunches or free milk pursuant to the federal Richard
B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. 1751 et seq., and the
federal Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. 1771 et seq., as such acts
and sections existed on January 1, 2021, and rules and regulations
adopted thereunder, plus (b) for schools that provided free meals to all
students pursuant to the community eligibility provision, the greater of
the number of students in such school who individually qualified for free
lunch or free milk using the most recent school fiscal year for which the
school did not provide free meals to all students pursuant to the
community eligibility provision or one hundred ten percent of the product
of the students who qualified for free meals at such school pursuant to
the community eligibility provision multiplied by the identified student
percentage calculated pursuant to such federal provision, except that the
free lunch and free milk calculated students for any school pursuant to
subdivision (18)(b) of this section shall not exceed one hundred percent
of the students qualified for free meals at such school pursuant to the
community eligibility provision;
(19) Full-day kindergarten means kindergarten offered by a district
for at least one thousand thirty-two instructional hours;
(20) General fund budget of expenditures means the total budget of
disbursements and transfers for general fund purposes as certified in the
budget statement adopted pursuant to the Nebraska Budget Act, except that
for purposes of the limitation imposed in section 79-1023, the general
fund budget of expenditures does not include any special grant funds,
exclusive of local matching funds, received by a district;
(21) General fund expenditures means all expenditures from the
general fund;
(22) General fund operating expenditures means, for state aid
calculated for each school fiscal year, as reported on the annual
financial report for the second school fiscal year immediately preceding
the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid, the total general fund
-5-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
expenditures minus (a) the amount of all receipts to the general fund, to
the extent that such receipts are not included in local system formula
resources, from early childhood education tuition, summer school tuition,
educational entities as defined in section 79-1201.01 for providing
distance education courses through the Educational Service Unit
Coordinating Council to such educational entities, private foundations,
individuals, associations, charitable organizations, the textbook loan
program authorized by section 79-734, federal impact aid, and levy
override elections pursuant to section 77-3444, (b) the amount of
expenditures for categorical funds, tuition paid to other school
districts, tuition paid to postsecondary institutions for college credit,
transportation fees paid to other districts, adult education, community
services, redemption of the principal portion of general fund debt
service, retirement incentive plans authorized by section 79-855, and
staff development assistance authorized by section 79-856, (c) the amount
of any transfers from the general fund to any bond fund and transfers
from other funds into the general fund, (d) any legal expenses in excess
of fifteen-hundredths of one percent of the formula need for the school
fiscal year in which the expenses occurred, (e) expenditures to pay for
incentives agreed to be paid by a school district to certificated
employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of employment for which
the State Board of Education approved an exclusion pursuant to
subdivision (1)(h), (i), (j), or (k) of section 79-1028.01, (f)(i)
expenditures to pay for employer contributions pursuant to subsection (2)
of section 79-958 to the School Employees Retirement System of the State
of Nebraska to the extent that such expenditures exceed the employer
contributions under such subsection that would have been made at a
contribution rate of seven and thirty-five hundredths percent or (ii)
expenditures to pay for school district contributions pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c)(i) or (1)(d)(i) of section 79-9,113 to the retirement
system established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement
-6-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
Act to the extent that such expenditures exceed the school district
contributions under such subdivision that would have been made at a
contribution rate of seven and thirty-seven hundredths percent, and (g)
any amounts paid by the district for lobbyist fees and expenses reported
to the Clerk of the Legislature pursuant to section 49-1483.
For purposes of this subdivision (22) of this section, receipts from
levy override elections shall equal ninety-nine percent of the difference
of the total general fund levy minus a levy of one dollar and five cents
per one hundred dollars of taxable valuation multiplied by the assessed
valuation for school districts that have voted pursuant to section
77-3444 to override the maximum levy provided pursuant to section
77-3442;
(23) Income tax liability means the amount of the reported income
tax liability for resident individuals pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue
Act of 1967 less all nonrefundable credits earned and refunds made;
(24) Income tax receipts means the amount of income tax collected
pursuant to the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967 less all nonrefundable
credits earned and refunds made;
(25) Limited English proficiency students means the number of
students with limited English proficiency in a district from the most
recent data available on November 1 of the school fiscal year preceding
the school fiscal year in which aid is to be paid plus the difference of
such students with limited English proficiency minus the average number
of limited English proficiency students for such district, prior to such
addition, for the three immediately preceding school fiscal years if such
difference is greater than zero;
(26) Local system means a unified system or a school district;
(27) Low-income child means a child under nineteen years of age
living in a household having an annual adjusted gross income for the
second calendar year preceding the beginning of the school fiscal year
for which aid is being calculated equal to or less than the maximum
-7-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
household income pursuant to sections 9(b)(1) and 17(c)(4) of the Richard
B. Russell National School Lunch Act, 42 U.S.C. 1758(b)(1) and 42 U.S.C.
1766(c)(4), respectively, and sections 3(a)(6) and 4(e)(1)(A) of the
Child Nutrition Act of 1966, 42 U.S.C. 1772(a)(6) and 42 U.S.C. 1773(e)
(1)(A), respectively, as such acts and sections existed on January 1,
2021, for a household of that size that would have allowed the child to
meet the income qualifications for free meals during the school fiscal
year immediately preceding the school fiscal year for which aid is being
calculated;
(28) Low-income students means the number of low-income children
within the district multiplied by the ratio of the formula students in
the district divided by the total children under nineteen years of age
residing in the district as derived from income tax information;
(29) Most recently available complete data year means the most
recent single school fiscal year for which the annual financial report,
fall school district membership report, annual statistical summary,
Nebraska income tax liability by school district for the calendar year in
which the majority of the school fiscal year falls, and adjusted
valuation data are available;
(30) Poverty students means the unadjusted poverty students plus the
difference of such unadjusted poverty students minus the average number
of poverty students for such district, prior to such addition, for the
three immediately preceding school fiscal years if such difference is
greater than zero;
(31) Qualified early childhood education average daily membership
means the product of the average daily membership of students who will be
eligible or required to attend kindergarten the following school year and
are enrolled in an early childhood education program approved by the
department pursuant to section 79-1103 for such school district for such
school year multiplied by the ratio of the actual instructional hours of
the program divided by one thousand thirty-two if: (a) The program is
-8-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
receiving a grant pursuant to such section for the third year; (b) the
program has already received grants pursuant to such section for three
years; or (c) the program has been approved pursuant to subsection (5) of
section 79-1103 for such school year and the two preceding school years,
including any such students in portions of any of such programs receiving
an expansion grant;
(32) Qualified early childhood education fall membership means the
product of membership on October 1 of each school year of students who
will be eligible or required to attend kindergarten the following school
year and are enrolled in an early childhood education program approved by
the department pursuant to section 79-1103 for such school district for
such school year multiplied by the ratio of the planned instructional
hours of the program divided by one thousand thirty-two if: (a) The
program is receiving a grant pursuant to such section for the third year;
(b) the program has already received grants pursuant to such section for
three years; or (c) the program has been approved pursuant to subsection
(5) of section 79-1103 for such school year and the two preceding school
years, including any such students in portions of any of such programs
receiving an expansion grant;
(33) Regular route transportation means the transportation of
students on regularly scheduled daily routes to and from the schools such
students attend;
(34) Reorganized district means any district involved in a
consolidation and currently educating students following consolidation;
(35) School year or school fiscal year means the fiscal year of a
school district as defined in section 79-1091;
(36) Sparse local system means a local system that is not a very
sparse local system but which meets the following criteria:
(a)(i) Less than two students per square mile in the county in which
each high school is located, based on the school district census, (ii)
less than one formula student per square mile in the local system, and
-9-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
(iii) more than ten miles between each high school and the next closest
high school on paved roads;
(b)(i) Less than one and one-half formula students per square mile
in the local system and (ii) more than fifteen miles between each high
school and the next closest high school on paved roads;
(c)(i) Less than one and one-half formula students per square mile
in the local system and (ii) more than two hundred seventy-five square
miles in the local system; or
(d)(i) Less than two formula students per square mile in the local
system and (ii) the local system includes an area equal to ninety-five
percent or more of the square miles in the largest county in which a high
school is located in the local system;
(37) Special education means specially designed kindergarten through
grade twelve instruction pursuant to section 79-1125, and includes
special education transportation;
(38) Special grant funds means the budgeted receipts for grants,
including, but not limited to, categorical funds, reimbursements for
wards of the court, short-term borrowings including, but not limited to,
registered warrants and tax anticipation notes, interfund loans,
insurance settlements, and reimbursements to county government for
previous overpayment. The state board shall approve a listing of grants
that qualify as special grant funds;
(39) State aid means the amount of assistance paid to a district
pursuant to the Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act;
(40) State board means the State Board of Education;
(41) State support means all funds provided to districts by the
State of Nebraska for the general fund support of elementary and
secondary education;
(42) Statewide average basic funding per formula student means the
statewide total basic funding for all districts divided by the statewide
total formula students for all districts;
-10-

LB161 LB161
2025 2025
(43) Statewide average general fund operating expenditures per
formula student means the statewide total general fund operating
expenditures for all districts divided by the statewide total formula
students for all districts;
(44) Teacher has the definition found in section 79-101;
(45) Tuition receipts from converted contracts means tuition
receipts received by a district from another district in the most
recently available complete data year pursuant to a converted contract
prior to the expiration of the contract;
(46) Tuitioned students means students in kindergarten through grade
twelve of the district whose tuition is paid by the district to some
other district or education agency;
(47) Unadjusted poverty students means the greater of the number of
low-income students or the free lunch and free milk calculated students
in a district; and
(48) Very sparse local system means a local system that has:
(a)(i) Less than one-half student per square mile in each county in
which each high school is located based on the school district census,
(ii) less than one formula student per square mile in the local system,
and (iii) more than fifteen miles between the high school and the next
closest high school on paved roads; or
(b)(i) More than four hundred fifty square miles in the local
system, (ii) less than one-half student per square mile in the local
system, and (iii) more than fifteen miles between each high school and
the next closest high school on paved roads.
Sec. 2. Original section 79-1003, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
-11-